Massachusetts, session 194th, H2785.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any statute, rule or regulation to the contrary, the commonwealth shall 
pay 90 percent of the monthly premium rate for the Group Health and Medical Insurance plan for 
state employees.